Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-2705
Dispute settlement procedure; effect; director; duties.

(1) The Director of Motor Vehicles shall adopt standards for an informal dispute settlement procedure which substantially comply with the provisions of 16 C.F.R. part 703, as such part existed on January 1, 2026.

(2) If a manufacturer has established or participates in a dispute settlement procedure certified by the Director of Motor Vehicles within the guidelines of such standards, the provisions of section 60-2703 concerning refunds or replacement shall not apply to any consumer who has not first resorted to such a procedure.

Laws 1983, LB 155, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 20;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 73;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 19;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 73;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 48;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 57;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 54;

Laws 2026, LB781, § 7.
July 18, 2026